Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2, 3 and 7  of this 2021 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 251.
SECTION 2. (1) The Secretary of State shall create and make publicly available a list of:
(a) The five most commonly spoken languages in the state, other than English; and
(b) The five most commonly spoken languages in each county, other than English.
(2) The lists created under subsection (1) of this section must:
(a) Be based on the best available data, which may include the  most recent American
Community Survey from the United States Census Bureau, estimates from  the Portland
State University Population Research Center and any other necessary data sources;
(b) Include, when complying with subsection (1)(b) of this section, the estimated  number
of individuals in each county who speak each listed language; and
(c) Be updated at least once every five years.
(3) The Secretary of State shall:
(a) Ensure each  state voters’ pamphlet mailed to residents of a county is translated in
the manner described in section 3 of this 2021 Act into:
(A) Each language listed by the Secretary of State under  subsection (1)(a) of this section;
(B) Each language listed by the Secretary  of State under subsection (1)(b) of this section
that the Secretary of State estimates under subsection (2)(b) of this section  to be spoken by
100 or more individuals in any one county; and
(C) Each language that has previously been listed by the Secretary of  State under sub-
section (1)(b)  of this section, even if the language is not included in the most recent list
created by the Secretary of State;
(b) Ensure each county voters’ pamphlet mailed to residents of a county is  translated in
the manner described in section 3 of this 2021 Act into:
(A) Each language listed by the Secretary of State under  subsection (1)(a) of this section;
(B) Each language listed for the county for that county  voters’ pamphlet by the Secre-
tary of State under subsection (1)(b) of this section that the Secretary of State estimates
under subsection (2)(b) of this section  to be spoken by 100 or more individuals in the county;
and
Enrolled House Bill 3021 (HB 3021-B) Page 1
(C) Each  language that has previously been listed by the Secretary of State for the
county for that county voters’ pamphlet under subsection  (1)(b) of this section, even if the
language is not included in the most recent list created by the Secretary of State;
(c) Make each translation of the voters’ pamphlet that is made under paragraph (a) or
(b) of this subsection or subsection (4) of this  section available on the website of the Secre-
tary of State and of the county as applicable; and
(d) Prominently provide the  website address for each translation in the manner set forth
in ORS 251.026 and 251.315.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(a)(B) and (b)(B)  of this section, if the Secretary of
State estimates under subsection (2)(b) of this section that no  language, other than English,
is spoken by 100 or more individuals in a particular  county, the Secretary of State shall en-
sure:
(a) Each state voters’ pamphlet mailed to  residents of the county is translated in the
manner described in section 3 of this 2021 Act into the most commonly  spoken language in
that county, other than English,  as listed by the Secretary of State under subsection (1)(b)
of this section; and
(b) Each county voters’ pamphlet mailed to residents of  the county is translated in the
manner described in section  3 of this 2021 Act into the most commonly spoken language in
that county, other than English, as listed by the Secretary of  State under subsection (1)(b)
of this section.
(5) The Secretary of State:
(a) May adopt any rules necessary to implement this section; and
(b) Is responsible for all costs necessary to comply with this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) The translation of a state voters’ pamphlet or  county voters’ pamphlet
required under section 2 of this 2021 Act shall be made in the manner  described in this sec-
tion.
(2) For each state voters’ pamphlet and county voters’ pamphlet mailed  to residents of
a county,  the Secretary of State shall have the following portions of the voters’ pamphlet
professionally translated into each language for  which a translation is required under section
2 of this 2021 Act:
(a) Any official  statement or communication made by the Secretary of State, county
clerk, filing office or other public elections official, including any information described  in
ORS 251.026 or 251.315 (1)(a) to (d) and (g) and any other information  regarding services of-
fered by elections offices, how to cast a ballot and key dates for the election;
(b) The ballot title for each measure;
(c) The explanatory statement for each measure;
(d) The financial estimate for each measure and any  statement prepared for a measure
under ORS 250.125;
(e) Any racial and ethnic impact statement prepared for a measure under ORS 137.685;
(f) Any statement submitted for a measure by a citizen panel under ORS 250.141; and
(g) Except an argument for a measure  prepared by the Legislative Assembly under ORS
251.245, any other  statement for a measure created by a public body as defined in ORS
174.109.
(3) In addition to the materials that the  Secretary of State is required to have profes-
sionally translated under subsection (2) of this section, the Secretary of State  shall allow to
be included in the translated version of each state voters’ pamphlet that is made available
on the website of the Secretary of State or of a county under section 2 of this 2021 Act:
(a) Translations of a candidate statement submitted under ORS 251.065, provided that:
(A) The candidate is a candidate for federal or statewide office;
(B) The translation is filed by a candidate or the principal campaign  committee of a
candidate described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;
Enrolled House Bill 3021 (HB 3021-B) Page 2
(C) Neither the translation nor the candidate statement submitted under  ORS 251.065 is
rejected under ORS 251.055;
(D) The candidate statement meets  the requirements of a candidate statement set forth
in this chapter; and
(E) Any translation filed under this paragraph  is in one of the five most commonly spo-
ken languages in this state, other than English, as listed by the Secretary of State under
section 2 of this 2021 Act.
(b) Translations  of an argument in support of or in opposition to a state measure filed
under ORS 251.255, provided that:
(A) The translation is filed by  the person who filed the argument in support of or in op-
position to a state measure under ORS 251.255;
(B) Neither the translation nor  the argument in support of or in opposition to a state
measure filed under ORS 251.255 is rejected under ORS 251.055;
(C) The statement in support of or  in opposition to a state measure meets the require-
ments of a statement in support of or in opposition to a state measure set forth in  this
chapter; and
(D) Any translation filed under this paragraph is in  one of the five most commonly spo-
ken languages in this state, other than English, as listed by the Secretary of State under
section 2 of this 2021 Act.
(c) Translations of any argument for a  measure prepared by the Legislative Assembly
under ORS 251.245 submitted by the Legislative Assembly, provided that any translation  filed
under this paragraph is  in one of the five most commonly spoken languages in this state,
other than English, as listed by the Secretary of State under section 2 of this 2021 Act.
(4)(a) A translation that is permitted or required under this section is  not required to
be identical in words to the original version but must be consistent with the meaning  of the
original version.
(b) A translation is not subject to  any limitations on the number of words allowed set
forth in this chapter.
(5) A county may at its own expense  make or accept for publication on the county’s
website, as part of a translated voters’ pamphlet  required under section 2 of this 2021 Act,
any portion of a state or county voters’ pamphlet that is not described in this section.
(6) The Secretary of State:
(a) May adopt any rules necessary to implement this section; and
(b) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, is responsible  for all costs nec-
essary to comply with this section.
(7) As used in this section, “statewide office” means Governor, Secretary of State,  State
Treasurer, Attorney General, Commissioner of the Bureau of  Labor and Industries, or judge
on the Oregon Supreme Court, the Oregon Court of Appeals or the Oregon Tax Court.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 251.026 is amended to read:
251.026. (1) The Secretary of State shall prepare and have printed in the voters’ pamphlet for
the state primary election, the general election and any  special election described in ORS 251.022
a statement containing, if applicable:
(a) Requirements for a citizen to qualify as an elector.
(b) When an elector is required to register or update a registration.
(c) In the voters’ pamphlet for the primary election,  a statement of the duties and responsibil-
ities of a precinct committeeperson to be elected at the primary election.
(d) Any other information the Secretary of  State considers relevant to the conduct of the
election.
(2) The Secretary of State , in cooperation with the county clerks,  shall include :
(a) A statement on the cover of the voters’ pamphlet that the pamphlet  may be used to assist
electors in voting[ .]; and
Enrolled House Bill 3021 (HB 3021-B) Page 3
(b)(A) Statements in the information section of the voters’ pamphlet on the  pages im-
mediately following the page containing the Secretary of State letter, to the  extent reason-
ably practicable, that, for  residents of each county to which the voters’ pamphlet is
distributed:
(i) Are written in English and the five additional common languages for the county listed
by the Secretary of State under section 2 of this 2021 Act;
(ii) Explain that  an electronic copy of portions of the voters’ pamphlet is publicly avail-
able in that language; and
(iii) Provide the website address to the translated voters’ pamphlet.
(B) The statements required under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph must be  written
so as to be clearly readable.
(C) The Secretary of State may adopt rules necessary to implement this paragraph.
(3) The Secretary of State may include in the voters’ pamphlet the following information:
(a) Maps showing the boundaries of senatorial and representative districts.
(b) Voter registration forms.
(c) Elector instructions, including the right of an elector to request a second ballot  if the first
ballot is spoiled and the right of an elector to seek assistance in marking the ballot.
(4)(a) The name of the  county clerk or other filing officer may not appear in the voters’ pam-
phlet in the county clerk’s or filing officer’s official capacity if the county clerk  or filing officer is
a candidate in the election for which the voters’ pamphlet is printed.
(b) As used in this subsection, “filing officer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 254.165.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 251.055 is amended to read:
251.055. (1) The Secretary of State  shall reject any statement, argument , translation  or other
matter offered for filing and [ printing] publishing in a voters’ pamphlet [ which] that :
(a) Contains any obscene, profane or defamatory language;
(b) Incites or advocates hatred, abuse or violence toward any person or group; or
(c) Contains any language which may not legally be circulated through the mails.
(2) Nothing in this chapter shall make the author of any statement , [ or] argument  or  trans-
lation exempt from any civil or criminal action because of any defamatory statements  offered for
[printing] publishing or contained in the voters’ pamphlet.  The persons writing, signing or offering
a statement , [ or] argument  or translation  for filing shall be deemed its authors and publishers.
(3) The Secretary of State by  rule shall establish a procedure to notify a person who offered a
statement, argument , translation or other matter that was rejected pursuant to this section. Subject
to voters’ pamphlet deadlines, the procedure shall require the Secretary of State to:
(a) Make reasonable attempts to notify the person of the rejection; and
(b) Allow the  person, if notified pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection, to revise the
statement, argument or translation  so that it does not violate the provisions of this section.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 251.315 is amended to read:
251.315. (1)  If a county produces a county voters’ pamphlet, the county voters’ pamphlet shall
include, when applicable, at least the following information:
(a) Requirements for a citizen to qualify as an elector.
(b) Requirements for registration and updates of registration.
(c) Elector instructions, including the right of an elector to request a second ballot  if the first
ballot is spoiled and the right of an elector to seek assistance in marking the ballot.
(d) The hours and locations of places designated under ORS 254.470 for deposit of official ballots.
(e) Any portraits  and statements relating to candidates submitted in accordance with the pro-
visions of ORS 251.305 to 251.435.
(f) Any ballot titles, explanatory statements and arguments submitted in accordance with  the
provisions of ORS 251.305 to 251.435.
(g)(A) Statements in  the information section of the voters’ pamphlet on the pages im-
mediately following the  page containing the Secretary of State letter, to the extent reason-
ably practicable, that:
Enrolled House Bill 3021 (HB 3021-B) Page 4
(i) Are written in English and the five additional common languages for the county listed
by the Secretary of State under section 2 of this 2021 Act;
(ii) Explain that  an electronic copy of portions of the voters’ pamphlet is publicly avail-
able in that language; and
(iii) Provide the website address to the translated voters’ pamphlet.
(B) The statements required under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph must be  written
so as to be clearly readable.
(C) The Secretary of State may adopt rules necessary to implement this paragraph.
[(g)] (h)  Such other information as the  county clerk considers to be appropriate or necessary to
inform the voters.
(2) The county clerk shall mail or otherwise distribute the county voters’ pamphlet not  later
than the last day for mailing ballots to electors as provided in ORS 254.470.
(3)(a) The name of the county clerk or other filing officer may not appear in the county  voters’
pamphlet in the county clerk’s or filing officer’s  official capacity if the county clerk or filing officer
is a candidate in the election for which the voters’ pamphlet is printed.
(b) As used in this subsection, “filing officer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 254.165.
SECTION 7.
(1)(a) The Translation Advisory Council is established. The council shall
consist of five at-large members and at least one translator member for each  of the five
most commonly spoken languages in this state, other than English,  and for each language
in each county that the Secretary of State reasonably anticipates  a voters’ pamphlet at the
next election will be required to be translated into under section 2  of this 2021 Act. The
secretary may appoint more than one translator member  for languages that are more com-
monly spoken throughout this  state. Members shall be appointed by and serve at the pleas-
ure of the secretary.
(b) The term of a member of the council is two years. A member may be reappointed
twice and may not  serve more than a total of six years. Before the expiration of the term
of a member, the Secretary of State shall  appoint a successor or reappoint the member. If
there is a vacancy for any cause, the  secretary shall make an appointment to be immediately
effective.
(c) The Secretary of State shall ensure, to the  extent practicable, that members ap-
pointed to the  council are geographically diverse and reside in counties throughout this
state. Prior to appointing each translator member, the  secretary shall confer with, and seek
recommendations from, the board of county commissioners for each county in  which the
secretary reasonably anticipates a voters’ pamphlet will be required to be translated  into the
language for which the translator member is appointed.
(d) To qualify to be  appointed as a translator member, a translator member must be
proficient in  reading and writing in English and in the translated language for which the
translator member is appointed. A translator member may demonstrate proficiency by pro-
viding:
(A) Proof of being certified as an interpreter by a public body of  this state for the
translated language;
(B) Proof of holding a bachelor’s degree or higher in the translated language;
(C) At least  one example of a written translation of the translated language that the
translator member conducted as part of the translator member’s job duties or  contracted
services; or
(D) Proof of volunteer experience in  translating the translated language with a nonprofit
organization, educational institution, social service agency or public body.
(2)(a) Members of the council shall elect at least one chairperson of the  council but may
elect two co-chairpersons of the council.
(b) A majority of the members of the council constitutes a  quorum for the transaction
of business.
Enrolled House Bill 3021 (HB 3021-B) Page 5
(c) The council shall meet at least once  every calendar year. To the extent practicable,
the council shall meet by telephone or video conference but may meet in person.
(d) The members of the council are entitled to compensation and expenses  in the manner
and amounts provided for in ORS 292.495.
(e) The Secretary of State shall  provide clerical and other necessary support services to
the council.
(3) The Secretary of State shall consult with the council and to the maximum extent
practicable implement recommendations for ensuring that a translation of a  voters’ pam-
phlet required under section 2 of this 2021 is:
(a) Conducted with professionalism and by a clear process with review;
(b) Culturally responsive and based in the context of a particular community being served
by the translation;
(c) As accurate in context and sentence structure as the original version; and
(d) Held to  the same standards as, but not subject to a higher scrutiny than, the original
version.
SECTION 8.
 Notwithstanding the term of office  specified by section 7 of this 2021 Act,
of the members first appointed to the Translation Advisory Council:
(1) Two of the at-large members shall serve an initial term of three years.
(2) Every other translator member that is appointed shall serve  an initial term of three
years.
SECTION 9.
In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriations, there is appro-
priated to the  Secretary of State, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $683,603 for the  purpose of carrying out the provisions of sections 2 to
8 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 10. Sections 2, 3 and 7 of this 2021 Act and  the amendments to ORS 251.026,
251.055 and 251.315 by sections 4 to 6 of this 2021 Act apply to all voters’ pamphlets  distrib-
uted on or after June 30, 2022.
SECTION 11. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House June 17, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3021 (HB 3021-B) Page 6